Washington statutes.
RCW 13.16.030

Mandatory function of counties.

The construction, acquisition and maintenance of juvenile detention facilities for dependent, wayward and delinquent children, separate and apart from the detention facilities for adults, is hereby declared to be a mandatory function of the several counties of the state.

[ 1945 c 188 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2004-2.]